Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB978.
hereby enacts as follows:12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 Section 1. Sections 406, 630.1, 909, 910, 976, 978.1, 981.1, 993(a) and (b), 998(a) and (b), 1004 and 1405 of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended to read:Section 406. Election Officers to Be Sworn.--All judges, inspectors, clerks of election and machine inspectors shall, before entering upon their duties at any primary or election, be duly sworn in the presence of each other and of the watchers and overseers, if any. The judge shall first be sworn by the minority inspector or by a magistrate, alderman or [justice of the peace] magisterial district judge, and the inspectors, clerks and machine inspectors shall then be sworn by the judge. Each of them shall forthwith sign in duplicate the oath taken by him upon forms to be furnished by the county board, and the same shall be attested by the officer who administered the oath.Section 630.1. Affidavits of Candidates.--Each candidate for any State, county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, school district or poor district office, or for the office of United States Senator or Representative in Congress, selected as provided in section 630 of this act, shall file with the nomination certificate an affidavit stating--(a) his residence, with street and number, if any, and his post-office address; (b) his election district, giving city, borough, town or township; (c) the name of the office for which he consents to be a candidate; (d) that he is eligible for such office; (e) that he will not knowingly violate any provision of this act, or of any law regulating and limiting election expenses and prohibiting corrupt practices in connection therewith; (f) unless he is a candidate for judge of a court of common pleas, the Philadelphia Municipal Court [or for the office of school board in a district 20250HB0978PN1061 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 where that office is elective] or for the office of [justice of the peace] magisterial district judge, that he is not a candidate for the same office of any party or political body other than the one designated in such certificate; (g) that he is aware of the provisions of section 1626 of this act requiring election and post-election reporting of campaign contributions and expenditures; and (h) that he is not a candidate for an office which he already holds, the term of which is not set to expire in the same year as the office subject to the affidavit.Section 909. Petition May Consist of Several Sheets; Statement of Circulator.--Said nomination petition may be on one or more sheets, and different sheets must be used for signers resident in different counties. If more than one sheet is used, they shall be bound together when offered for filing if they are intended to constitute one petition, and each sheet shall be numbered consecutively beginning with number one, at the foot of each page. In cases of petitions for delegate or alternate delegate to National conventions, each sheet shall contain a notation indicating the presidential candidate to whom he is committed or the term "uncommitted." Each sheet shall have appended thereto the statement of the circulator of each sheet, setting forth, subject to the penalties of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities)--(a) that he or she is a qualified elector of the Commonwealth, who is duly registered and enrolled as a member of the party designated in said petition, unless said petition relates to the nomination of a candidate for a court of common pleas, for the Philadelphia Municipal Court or for [justice of the peace] magisterial district judge, in which event the circulator need not be a duly registered and enrolled member of the designated party; (b) his 20250HB0978PN1061 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 residence, giving city, borough or township, with street and number, if any; (c) that the signers thereto signed with full knowledge of the contents of the petition; (d) that their respective residences are correctly stated therein; (e) that they all reside in the county named in the statement; (f) that each signed on the date set opposite his name; and (g) that, to the best of the circulator's knowledge and belief, the signers are qualified electors and duly registered and enrolled members of the designated party of the State, or of the political district, as the case may be.Section 910. Affidavits of Candidates.--Each candidate for any State, county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, ward, school district, poor district, election district, party office, party delegate or alternate, or for the office of United States Senator or Representative in Congress, shall file with his nomination petition his affidavit stating--(a) his residence, with street and number, if any, and his post-office address; (b) his election district, giving city, borough, town or township; (c) the name of the office for which he consents to be a candidate; (d) that he is eligible for such office; (e) that he will not knowingly violate any provision of this act, or of any law regulating and limiting nomination and election expenses and prohibiting corrupt practices in connection therewith; (f) unless he is a candidate for judge of a court of common pleas, the Philadelphia Municipal Court [or for the office of school director in a district where that office is elective] or for the office of [justice of the peace] magisterial district judge that he is not a candidate for nomination for the same office of any party other than the one designated in such petition; (g) if he is a candidate for a 20250HB0978PN1061 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 delegate, or alternate delegate, member of State committee, National committee or party officer, that he is a registered and enrolled member of the designated party; (h) if he is a candidate for delegate or alternate delegate the presidential candidate to whom he is committed or the term "uncommitted"; (i) that he is aware of the provisions of section 1626 of this act requiring pre-election and post-election reporting of campaign contributions and expenditures; and (j) that he is not a candidate for an office which he already holds, the term of which is not set to expire in the same year as the office subject to the affidavit. In cases of petitions for delegate and alternate delegate to National conventions, the candidate's affidavit shall state that his signature to the delegate's statement, as hereinafter set forth, if such statement is signed by said candidate, was affixed to the sheet or sheets of said petition prior to the circulation of same. In the case of a candidate for nomination as President of the United States, it shall not be necessary for such candidate to file the affidavit required in this section to be filed by candidates, but the post-office address of such candidate shall be stated in such nomination petition.Section 976. Examination of Nomination Petitions, Certificates and Papers; Return of Rejected Nomination Petitions, Certificates and Papers.--When any nomination petition, nomination certificate or nomination paper is presented in the office of the Secretary of the Commonwealth or of any county board of elections for filing within the period limited by this act, it shall be the duty of the said officer or board to examine the same. No nomination petition, nomination paper or nomination certificate shall be permitted to be filed 20250HB0978PN1061 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 if--(a) it contains material errors or defects apparent on the face thereof, or on the face of the appended or accompanying affidavits; or (b) it contains material alterations made after signing without the consent of the signers; or (c) it does not contain a sufficient number of signatures as required by law; Provided, however, That the Secretary of the Commonwealth or the county board of elections, although not hereby required so to do, may question the genuineness of any signature or signatures appearing thereon, and if he or it shall thereupon find that any such signature or signatures are not genuine, such signature or signatures shall be disregarded in determining whether the nomination petition, nomination paper or nomination certificate contains a sufficient number of signatures as required by law; or (d) in the case of nomination petitions, if nomination petitions have been filed for printing the name of the same person for the same office, except the office of judge of a court of common pleas, the Philadelphia Municipal Court [or the office of school director in districts where that office is elective] or the office of [justice of the peace] magisterial district judge upon the official ballot of more than one political party; or (e) in the case of nomination papers, if the candidate named therein has filed a nomination petition for any public office for the ensuing primary, or has been nominated for any such office by nomination papers previously filed; or (f) if the nomination petitions or papers are not accompanied by the filing fee or certified check required for said office; or (g) in the case of nomination papers, the appellation set forth therein is identical with or deceptively similar to the words used by any existing party or by any political body which has already filed nomination papers for the same office, or if the 20250HB0978PN1061 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appellation set forth therein contains part of the name, or an abbreviation of the name or part of the name of an existing political party, or of a political body which has already filed nomination papers for the same office. The invalidity of any sheet of a nomination petition or nomination paper shall not affect the validity of such petition or paper if a sufficient petition or paper remains after eliminating such invalid sheet. The action of said officer or board in refusing to receive and file any such nomination petition, certificate or paper, may be reviewed by the court upon an application to compel its reception as of the date when it was presented to the office of such officer or board: Provided, however, That said officer or board shall be entitled to a reasonable time in which to examine any petitions, certificates or papers, and to summon and interrogate the candidates named therein, or the persons presenting said petitions, certificates or papers, and his or their retention of same for the purpose of making such examination or interrogation shall not be construed as an acceptance or filing.Upon completion of any examination, if any nomination petition, certificate or paper is found to be defective, it shall forthwith be rejected and returned to the candidate or one of the candidates named therein, together with a statement of the reasons for such rejection:Provided further, That no nomination petition, nomination paper or nomination certificate shall be permitted to be filed, if the political party or political body referred to therein shall be composed of a group of electors whose purposes or aims, or one of whose purposes or aims, is the establishment, control, conduct, seizure or overthrow of the Government of the 20250HB0978PN1061 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth of Pennsylvania or the United States of America by the use of force, violence, military measure or threats of one or more of the foregoing. The authority to reject such nomination petition, paper or certificate for this reason shall, when filed with the Secretary of the Commonwealth, be vested in a committee composed of the Governor, the Attorney General and the Secretary of the Commonwealth, and when filed with any county board of elections shall be vested in such board. If in such case the committee or board, as the case may be, shall conclude that the acceptance of such nomination petition, paper or certificate should be refused, it shall within two days of the filing of such nomination petition, paper or certificate fix a place and a time five days in advance for hearing the matter, and notice thereof shall be given to all parties affected thereby. At the time and place so fixed the committee or board, as the case may be, shall hear testimony, but shall not be bound by technical rules of evidence. The testimony presented shall be stenographically recorded and made a part of the record of the committee or board. Within two days after such hearing the committee or board, if satisfied upon competent evidence that the said nomination petition, paper or certificate is not entitled to be accepted and filed, it shall announce its decision and immediately notify the parties affected thereby. Failure to announce decision within two days after such hearing shall be conclusive that such nomination petition, paper or certificate has been accepted and filed. The decision of said committee or board in refusing to accept and file such nomination petition, paper or certificate may be reviewed by the court upon an application to compel its reception as of the date when presented to the Secretary of the Commonwealth or such 20250HB0978PN1061 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 board. The application shall be made within two days of the time when such decision is announced. If the application is properly made, any judge of said court may fix a time and place for hearing the matter in dispute, of which notice shall be served with a copy of said application upon the Secretary of the Commonwealth or the county board of elections, as the case may be. At the time so fixed, the court, or any judge thereof assigned for the purpose, shall hear the case de novo. If after such hearing the said court shall find that the decision of the committee or the board was erroneous, it shall issue its mandate to the committee or board to correct its decision and to accept and file the nomination paper, petition or certificate. From any decision of the court an appeal may be taken within two days after the entry thereof. It shall be the duty of the said court to fix the hearing and to announce its decision within such period of time as will permit the Secretary of the Commonwealth or the county board of elections to permit the names of the candidates affected by the court's decision to be printed on the ballot, if the court should so determine.Section 978.1. Vacancy in Party Nomination by Failure to Pay Filing Fee or for Failure to File Loyalty Oath.--Every person nominated at any primary election as the candidate of any political party for any office, other than a borough, town, township, school district or poor district office, or the office of [justice of the peace] magisterial district judge, or constable, who has not paid the filing fee required by section nine hundred thirteen of this act, as amended, for the filing of a nomination petition for such office, or who has not filed the loyalty oath required by section 14, act of December 22, 1951 (P.L.1726), known as the "Pennsylvania Loyalty Act," as last 20250HB0978PN1061 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 amended June 19, 1961 (P.L.446), shall pay the amount of such fee to and file such oath with the Secretary of the Commonwealth, or the county board of elections, as the case may be, at least eighty-five (85) days previous to the day of the general or municipal election at which such candidate's name would appear on the ballot. Failure to pay such fee or file such oath within the time herein prescribed shall result in a vacancy in such party nomination. Such vacancy shall be filled in the manner hereinafter provided for the filling of such vacancies happening by reason of the death or withdrawal of any candidate.Section 981.1. Affidavits of Candidates.--Each candidate for any State, county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, ward, school district, poor district or election district office, or for the office of United States Senator or Representative in Congress, selected as provided in sections 979 and 980 of this act, shall file with the substituted nomination certificate an affidavit stating--(a) his residence, with street and number, if any, and his post-office address; (b) his election district, giving city, borough, town or township; (c) the name of the office for which he consents to be a candidate; (d) that he is eligible for such office; (e) that he will not knowingly violate any provision of this act, or of any law regulating and limiting election expenses and prohibiting corrupt practices in connection therewith; (f) unless he is a candidate for judge of a court of common pleas, the Philadelphia Municipal Court [or for the office of school board in a district where that office is elective] or for the office of [justice of the peace] magisterial district judge, that he is not a candidate for the same office of any party or political body other than the one designated in such certificate; (g) that he 20250HB0978PN1061 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is aware of the provisions of section 1626 of this act requiring election and post-election reporting of campaign contributions and expenditures; and (h) that he is not a candidate for an office which he already holds, the term of which is not set to expire in the same year as the office subject to the affidavit.Section 993. Filling of Certain Vacancies in Public Office by Means of Nomination Certificates and Nomination Papers.--(a) In all cases where a vacancy shall occur for any cause in an elective public office, including that of judge of a court of record, at a time when such vacancy is required by the provisions of the Constitution or the laws of this Commonwealth to be filled at the ensuing election but at a time when nominations for such office cannot be made under any other provision of this act, nominations to fill such vacancies shall be made by political parties in accordance with party rules relating to the filling of vacancies by means of nomination certificates in the form prescribed in section nine hundred ninety-four of this act, and by political bodies by means of nomination papers in accordance with the provisions of sections nine hundred fifty-one, nine hundred fifty-two and nine hundred fifty-four of this act. No such nomination certificate shall nominate any person who has already been nominated by any other political party or by any political body for the same office unless such person is a candidate for the office of judge of a court of common pleas, the Philadelphia Municipal Court [or for the office of school director in districts where that office is elective] or for the office of [justice of the peace] magisterial district judge. No such nomination papers shall nominate any person who has already been nominated by any political party or by any other political body for any office to 20250HB0978PN1061 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be filled at the ensuing November election, unless such person is a candidate for the office of judge of a court of common pleas, the Philadelphia Municipal Court [or for the office of school director in districts where that office is elective] or for the office of [justice of the peace] magisterial district judge.(b) Said nomination certificates and nomination papers for State public offices and judges of courts of records shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of the Commonwealth at least fifty (50) days prior to a general or municipal election, as the case may be. Nomination certificates and nomination papers for public offices in counties, cities, boroughs, towns, townships, wards and school districts and for the offices of aldermen and [justices of the peace] magisterial district judges shall be filed in the office of the county board of elections at least fifty (50) days prior to a municipal election.* * *Section 998. Substituted Nominations to Fill Certain Vacancies for a November Election.--(a) Any vacancy happening or existing in any party nomination made in accordance with the provisions of section nine hundred ninety-three of this act for a November election by reason of the death or withdrawal of any candidate may be filled by a substituted nomination made by such committee as is authorized by the rules of the party to make nominations in the event of vacancies on the party ticket, in the form prescribed by section nine hundred ninety-four of this act. But no substituted nomination certificate shall nominate any person who has already been nominated by any other political party or by any political body for the same office, unless such person is a candidate for the office of judge of a court of 20250HB0978PN1061 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 common pleas, the Philadelphia Municipal Court [or for the office of school director in districts where that office is elective] or for the office of [justice of the peace] magisterial district judge.(b) In case of the death or withdrawal of any candidate nominated by a political body for an election, the committee named in the original nomination papers may nominate a substitute in his place by filing a substituted nomination certificate in the form and manner prescribed by section nine hundred eighty of this act. In the case of a vacancy caused by the death of any candidate, said nomination certificate shall be accompanied by a death certificate properly certified. No substituted nomination certificate shall nominate any person who has already been nominated by any political party or by any other political body for any office to be filled at the ensuing November election, unless such person is a candidate for the office of judge of a court of common pleas, the Philadelphia Municipal Court [or for the office of school director in districts where that office is elective] or for the office of [justice of the peace] magisterial district judge.* * *Section 1004. Form of Ballots; Printing Ballots.--From the lists furnished by the Secretary of the Commonwealth under the provisions of sections 915 and 984, and from petitions and papers filed in their office, the county election board shall print the official primary and election ballots in accordance with the provisions of this act: Provided, however, That in no event, shall the name of any person consenting to be a candidate for nomination for any one office, except the office of judge of a court of common pleas, the Philadelphia Municipal Court [or 20250HB0978PN1061 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the office of school director in districts where that office is elective] or the office of [justice of the peace] magisterial district judge be printed as a candidate for such office upon the official primary ballot of more than one party. All ballots for use in the same election district at any primary or election shall be alike.Section 1405. Manner of Computing Irregular Ballots.--The county board, in computing the votes cast at any primary or election, shall compute and certify votes cast on irregular ballots exactly as such names were written, stamped or deposited in or on receptacles for that purpose, and as they have been so returned by the election officers. In districts in which paper ballots or ballot cards are electronically tabulated, stickers or labels may not be used to mark ballots. A vote cast by means of a sticker or label affixed to a ballot or ballot card shall be void and may not be counted. In the primary the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall not certify the votes cast on irregular ballots for any person for a National office including that of the President of the United States, United States Senator and Representative in Congress; or for any State office including that of Governor and Lieutenant Governor, Auditor General, State Treasurer, Senator and Representative in the General Assembly, justices and judges of courts of record or for any party office including that of delegate or alternate delegate to National conventions and member of State committee unless the total number of votes cast for said person is equal to or greater than the number of signatures required on a nomination petition for the particular office. In the primary the county board shall not certify the votes cast on irregular ballots for any person for a [justice of the peace] magisterial district judge, constable, 20250HB0978PN1061 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 National, State, county, city, borough, town, township, ward, school district, election or local party office unless the total number of votes cast for said person is equal to or greater than the number of signatures required on a nomination petition for the particular office.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0978PN1061 - 15 - 123456